Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2831.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 128C.24, is amended to read: 128C.24 LEAGUE FUNDS TRANSFER. deleted text begin Beginningdeleted text end new text begin (a) Everynew text end July 1, deleted text begin 2007,deleted text end the Minnesota State High School League deleted text begin shall annuallydeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end determine the sales tax savings attributable to section 297A.70, subdivision 11a, and annually transfer that amount to a nonprofit charitable foundation created for the purpose of promoting high school extracurricular activities. The funds must be used by the foundation to make grants to fund, assist, recognize, or promote high school students' participation in extracurricular activities. The first priority for funding will be grants for scholarships to individuals to offset athletic fees. The foundation must equitably award grants based on considerations of gender balance, school size, and geographic location, to the extent feasible. new text begin (b) This section expires July 1, 2035. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.70, subdivision 11a, is amended to read: Subd. 11a. Minnesota State High School League tickets and admissions. new text begin (a) new text end Tickets and admissions to games, events, and activities sponsored by the Minnesota State High School League under chapter 128C are exempt. new text begin (b) This section expires July 1, 2035. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. Laws 2017, First Special Session chapter 1, article 3, section 4, the effective date, is amended to read: EFFECTIVE DATE. This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2017deleted text begin , and before July 1, 2027deleted text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 4. Laws 2017, First Special Session chapter 1, article 3, section 26, the effective date, is amended to read: EFFECTIVE DATE. This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2017deleted text begin , and before July 1, 2027deleted text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end